Utah statutes.
58-37d-7.   Seizure and forfeiture.
Chemicals, equipment, supplies, vehicles, aircraft, vessels, and personal and
real property used in furtherance of a clandestine laboratory operation are
subject to seizure and forfeiture under the procedures and substantive
protections of Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act.
